Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-10,147
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature to fully fund the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act each year.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 142.

Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act, see section 79-1001.